ko: 기화기 배럴 수: 1배럴; 2배럴; 3배럴; 4배럴; 6배럴; 기타
tr: Karbüratör boğaz sayısı: 1 boğazlı; 2 boğazlı; 3 boğazlı; 4 boğazlı; 6 boğazlı; Diğer
sl-SI: Število valjev uplinjača: 1-grlni; 2-grlni; 3-grlni; 4-grlni; 6-grlni; Drugo
vi: Số lượng họng ga trong bộ chế hòa khí: 1 họng; 2 họng; 3 họng; 4 họng; 6 họng; Khác
fi: Kaasuttimen kurkkujen määrä: 1-kurkkuinen; 2-kurkkuinen; 3-kurkkuinen; 4-kurkkuinen; 6-kurkkuinen; Muu
lt-LT: Karbiuratoriaus cilindrų skaičius: 1 kameros; 2 kamerų; 3 kamerų; 4 kamerų; 6 kamerų; Kita
pl: Liczba gardzieli gaźnika: 1-przelotowy; 2-przelotowy; 3-przelotowy; 4-przelotowy; 6-przelotowy; Inne
pt-PT: Contagem de cilindros do carburador: 1 corpo; 2 corpos; 3 corpos; 4 corpos; 6 corpos; Outro
hu: Karburátorhengerek száma: 1 torkú; 2 torkú; 3 torkú; 4 torkú; 6 torkú; Egyéb
ja: キャブレターのバレル数: 1バレル; 2バレル; 3バレル; 4バレル; 6バレル; その他
th: จำนวนท่ออากาศในคาร์บูเรเตอร์: 1 บาร์เรล; 2 บาร์เรล; 3 บาร์เรล; 4 บาร์เรล; 6 บาร์เรล; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Брой камери на карбуратора: Еднокамерен; Двукамерен; Трикамерен; Четирикамерен; Шесткамерен; Друго
en: Carburetor barrel count: 1-barrel; 2-barrel; 3-barrel; 4-barrel; 6-barrel; Other
fr: Nombre de corps de carburateur: 1 corps; Double corps; 3 corps; Quadruple corps; 6 corps; Autre
cs: Počet komor karburátoru: Jednokomorový; Dvoukomorový; Tříkomorový; Čtyřkomorový; Šestikomorový; Jiné
zh-TW: 化油器缸數: 單腔; 雙腔; 三腔; 四腔; 六腔; 其他
hr-HR: Broj cijevi rasplinjača: 1 grlo; 2 grla; 3 grla; 4 grla; 6 grla; Ostalo
nl: Carburettor cilinder aantal: 1-barrel; 2-barrel; 3-barrel; 4-barrel; 6-barrel; Overige
ro-RO: Numărul de jgheaburi din carburator: 1 corp; 2 corpuri; 3 corpuri; 4 corpuri; 6 corpuri; Altele
da: Antal karburatorløb: 1-portet; 2-portet; 3-portet; 4-portet; 6-portet; Andet
nb: Antall forgasserfat: 1-ports; 2-ports; 3-ports; 4-ports; 6-ports; Annet
ru: Количество камер карбюратора: Однокамерный; Двухкамерный; Трехкамерный; Четырехкамерный; Шестикамерный; Другое
es: Cantidad de cuerpos del carburador: 1 cuerpo; 2 cuerpos; 3 cuerpos; 4 cuerpos; 6 cuerpos; Otro
pt-BR: Contagem de cilindros do carburador: 1 corpo; 2 corpos; 3 corpos; 4 corpos; 6 corpos; Outro
it: Numero di cilindri del carburatore: 1 corpo; 2 corpi; 3 corpi; 4 corpi; 6 corpi; Altro
zh-CN: 化油器腔数: 单腔; 双腔; 3 腔; 4 腔; 6 腔; 其他
sv: Antal förgasarrör: 1-ports; 2-ports; 3-ports; 4-ports; 6-ports; Annat
sk-SK: Počet valcov karburátora: 1-komorový; 2-komorový; 3-komorový; 4-komorový; 6-komorový; Iný
el: Αριθμός θαλάμων (βαρελιών) του καρμπυρατέρ: 1 σώματος; 2 σωμάτων; 3 σωμάτων; 4 σωμάτων; 6 σωμάτων; Άλλο
de: Anzahl der Vergaserzylinder: 1-fach; 2-fach; 3-fach; 4-fach; 6-fach; Sonstige